New York, session 2025-2026, A8782.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. (a) The commissioner of parks, recreation and historic 2 preservation, in conjunction with the department of economic develop- 3 ment, shall conduct a feasibility study and prepare a report on the 4 potential reestablishment of the empire state summer games. Such study 5 shall explore the overall costs of reestablishing the empire state 6 summer games, as well as costs associated with the marketing of such 7 games through the department of economic development. Such study shall 8 also explore the potential revenue generated by hosting and marketing 9 the empire state summer games. 10 (b) On or before December 31, 2026, the commissioner of parks, recre- 11 ation and historic preservation and the department of economic develop- 12 ment shall issue a report of the findings of the feasibility study to 13 the governor, the temporary president of the senate, and the speaker of 14 the assembly. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13310-02-5